Utah statutes.
70D-2-501.   Civil liability -- Misdemeanor.

(1) (a)  A lender, broker, or servicer who violates this chapter is liable to an injured party for actual damages.

(b)  In an action filed to determine the liability of a lender, broker, or servicer for damages under this chapter, the prevailing party is entitled to court costs and attorney fees.

(2)  A person who wilfully violates this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 72, 2009 General Session

